Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-193
Odometers; application for certificate of title; statement required.

The statement required by section 60-192 shall be on a form prescribed by the department or shall appear on the certificate of title. Such statement shall be submitted with the application for certificate of title unless the statement appears on the certificate of title being submitted with the application. The statement required by section 60-192 shall appear on the new certificate of title issued in the name of the transferee. No certificate of title shall be issued for a motor vehicle unless the application is accompanied by such statement or unless the information required by such statement appears on the certificate of title being submitted with the application.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 93;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 20.